Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.305

Distribution of assets.

(1) Upon the winding up of a limited liability company, the assets are distributed as follows:

(a) To creditors, including members and managers who are creditors, to the extent otherwise permitted by law, in satisfaction of liabilities of the limited liability company, whether by payment or the making of reasonable provision for payment thereof, other than liabilities for which reasonable provision for payment has been made and liabilities for distributions to members under RCW 25.15.211 or 25.15.226;

(b) To members and former members in satisfaction of liabilities for distributions under RCW 25.15.211 or 25.15.226; and

(c) To members first for the return of their contributions and second respecting their limited liability company interests, in the proportions in which the members share in distributions.

(2) A limited liability company that has dissolved must pay or make reasonable provision to pay all claims and obligations, including all contingent, conditional, or unmatured claims and obligations, known to the limited liability company and all claims and obligations which are known to the limited liability company but for which the identity of the claimant is unknown. A limited liability company shall not be required to make provision to pay claims that are or later become barred under RCW 25.15.301 or 25.15.309 or other applicable law. If there are sufficient assets, such claims and obligations must be paid in full and any such provision for payment made must be made in full. If there are insufficient assets, such claims and obligations must be paid or provided for according to their priority and, among claims and obligations of equal priority, ratably to the extent of assets available therefor. Any remaining assets must be distributed as provided in this chapter. Any person winding up a limited liability company's affairs who has complied with this section is not personally liable to the claimants of the dissolved limited liability company by reason of such person's actions in winding up the limited liability company.

[ 2015 c 188 s 60.]